Washington statutes.
RCW 19.305.040

Markings—Requirements.

(1) Cigarettes that are certified by a manufacturer in accordance with RCW 19.305.030 must be marked to indicate compliance with the requirements of RCW 19.305.020. The marking must be in eight-point type or larger and consist of:

(a) Modification of the universal product code to include a visible mark printed at or around the area of the code. The mark may consist of alphanumeric or symbolic characters permanently stamped, engraved, embossed, or printed in conjunction with the universal product code; or

(b) Any visible combination of alphanumeric or symbolic characters permanently stamped, engraved, or embossed upon the cigarette package or cellophane wrap; or

(c) Printed, stamped, engraved, or embossed text that indicates that the cigarettes meet the standards of this chapter.

(2) A manufacturer shall use only one marking, and shall apply this marking uniformly for all packages, including but not limited to packs, cartons, and cases, and brands marketed by that manufacturer.

(3) The state director of fire protection must be notified as to the marking that is selected.

(4) Prior to the certification of any cigarette, a manufacturer shall present its proposed marking to the state director of fire protection for approval. Upon receipt of the request, the state director of fire protection shall approve or disapprove the marking offered, except that the state director of fire protection shall (a) approve the letters "FSC," which signify fire standards compliant; and (b) give preference to any packaging marking in use and approved for that cigarette in New York pursuant to New York Executive Law section 156-c, Fire Safety Standards for Cigarettes, unless the state director of fire protection demonstrates a reasonable basis why that marking should not be approved under this chapter. Proposed markings are deemed approved if the state director of fire protection fails to act within ten business days of receiving a request for approval.

(5) A manufacturer shall not modify its approved marking unless the modification has been approved by the state director of fire protection in accordance with this section.

(6) Manufacturers certifying cigarettes in accordance with RCW 19.305.030 shall provide a copy of the certifications to all wholesale dealers and agents to which they sell cigarettes, and shall also provide sufficient copies of an illustration of the package marking utilized by the manufacturer under this section for each retail dealer to which the wholesale dealers or agents sell cigarettes. Wholesale dealers and agents shall provide a copy of these package markings received from manufacturers to all retail dealers to which they sell cigarettes. Wholesale dealers, agents, and retail dealers shall permit the state director of fire protection, the department of revenue, the attorney general, and their employees to inspect markings of cigarette packaging marked in accordance with this section.

[ 2008 c 239 s 4.]